Washington statutes.
RCW 25.10.661

Name of foreign limited partnership.

The name of a foreign limited partnership registered in this state must comply with the provisions of RCW 23.95.525 and Article 3 of chapter 23.95 RCW.

[ 2015 c 176 s 6123; 2009 c 188 s 905.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Contingent effective date—2015 c 176: See note following RCW 23.95.100.